Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.63.061

Comprehensive plan—Required elements.

The comprehensive plan shall be in such form and of such scope as the code city's ordinance or charter may require. It may consist of a map or maps, diagrams, charts, reports and descriptive and explanatory text or other devices and materials to express, explain, or depict the elements of the plan; and it shall include a recommended plan, scheme, or design for each of the following elements:

(1) A land-use element that designates the proposed general distribution, general location, and extent of the uses of land. These uses may include, but are not limited to, agricultural, residential, commercial, industrial, recreational, educational, public, and other categories of public and private uses of land. The land-use element shall also include estimates of future population growth in, and statements of recommended standards of population density and building intensity for, the area covered by the comprehensive plan. The land use element shall also provide for protection of the quality and quantity of groundwater used for public water supplies and shall review drainage, flooding, and stormwater runoff in the area and nearby jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or cleanse those discharges that pollute Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.

(2) A circulation element consisting of the general location, alignment, and extent of existing and proposed major thoroughfares, major transportation routes, and major terminal facilities, all of which shall be correlated with the land-use element of the comprehensive plan.

[ 1985 c 126 s 2; 1984 c 253 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.63.061.]